Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1237
Bridge commission; funds; investment.

Funds under control of the commission may be invested in certificates of deposit in national banks, capital stock financial institutions, or qualifying mutual financial institutions or in bonds or other evidences of indebtedness which are general obligations of the United States, the State of Nebraska or other states, or the city or the cities cooperating as provided in section 14-1202, but only in such a manner as to be immediately available for recapture when needed for the purposes authorized in sections 14-1201 to 14-1252. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 15, p. 626;

C.S.1929, § 14-1215;

R.S.1943, § 14-1237;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 11;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 12.